Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1005
Acquisition of property.

Such interstate control body as is or may be created by virtue of section 13-1004 shall have the right to acquire or receive, solely as trustees for the use and benefit of such conservation or recreational improvement district, real and personal property by deed, gift, purchase or otherwise to be used exclusively for the purposes defined in section 13-1001.

Laws 1935, c. 39, § 5, p. 156;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1705;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-905.